Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.015

Applicant for permit or certificate—Immigration and citizenship status.

An individual who is not lawfully present in the United States is eligible for a permit or certificate as allowed under Title 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1621. The professional educator standards board and the superintendent of public instruction shall not deny an application for a permit or certificate solely on the basis of a person's immigration or citizenship status if the person has met all other qualifications.

[ 2024 c 50 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 50: See note following RCW 18.415.010.